Nebraska, session 109, LB269.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB269 LB269
2025 2025
Section 1. Section 77-27,143, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska,
is amended to read:
77-27,143 (1) The administration of all sales and use taxes adopted
under the Local Option Revenue Act shall be by the Tax Commissioner who
may prescribe forms and adopt and promulgate reasonable rules and
regulations in conformity with the act for the making of returns and for
the ascertainment, assessment, and collection of taxes imposed under such
act. The incorporated municipality shall furnish a certified copy of the
adopting or repealing ordinance to the Tax Commissioner in accordance
with such rules and regulations as he or she may adopt and promulgate.
For ordinances passed after October 1, 1969, the effective date shall be
the first day of the next calendar quarter which is at least one hundred
twenty days following receipt by the Tax Commissioner of the certified
copy of the ordinance. The Tax Commissioner shall provide at least sixty
days' notice of the change in tax to retailers. Notice shall be provided
to retailers within the municipality. Notice to retailers may be provided
through the website of the Department of Revenue or by other electronic
means.
(2) For ordinances containing a termination date and passed after
October 1, 1986, the termination date shall be the first day of a
calendar quarter. The incorporated municipality shall furnish a certified
statement to the Tax Commissioner no more than one hundred eighty days
and at least one hundred twenty days prior to the termination date that
the termination date stated in the ordinance is still valid. If the
certified statement is not furnished within the prescribed time, the tax
shall remain in effect, and the Tax Commissioner shall continue to
collect the tax until the first day of the calendar quarter which is at
least one hundred twenty days after receipt of the certified statement
notwithstanding the termination date stated in the ordinance. The Tax
Commissioner shall provide at least sixty days' notice of the termination
of the tax to retailers. Notice shall be provided to retailers within the
-2-

LB269 LB269
2025 2025
municipality. Notice to retailers may be provided through the website of
the department or by other electronic means.
(3) For sales and use tax purposes only, local jurisdiction boundary
changes apply only on the first day of a calendar quarter after a minimum
of one hundred twenty days' notice to the Tax Commissioner and sixty
days' notice to sellers.
(4) The state shall provide and maintain a database that describes
boundary changes for all local taxing jurisdictions. This database shall
include a description of any change and the effective date of the change
for sales and use tax purposes.
(5) The state shall provide and maintain a database of all sales and
use tax rates for all of the local jurisdictions levying taxes within the
state. For the identification of counties, cities, and villages, codes
corresponding to the rates shall be provided according to Federal
Information Processing Standards as developed by the National Institute
of Standards and Technology.
(6) The state shall provide and maintain a database that assigns
each five-digit and nine-digit zip code within the state to the proper
tax rates and jurisdictions. For purposes of the streamlined sales and
use tax agreement, the database shall apply the lowest combined tax rate
imposed in the zip code area if the area includes more than one tax rate
in any level of taxing jurisdictions. If a nine-digit zip code
designation is not available for a street address or if a seller is
unable to determine the nine-digit zip code designation applicable to a
purchase after exercising due diligence to determine the designation, the
seller or certified service provider may apply the rate for the five-
digit zip code area. For purposes of this section, there is a rebuttable
presumption that a seller or certified service provider has exercised due
diligence if the seller has attempted to determine the nine-digit zip
code designation by utilizing software approved by the governing board
that makes this designation from the street address and the five-digit
-3-

LB269 LB269
2025 2025
zip code applicable to a purchase.
(6) The state shall provide and maintain an (7) For purposes of the
streamlined sales and use tax agreement, the state may provide address-
based boundary database records for assigning taxing jurisdictions and
their associated rates that which shall be in addition to the
requirements of subsection (6) of this section. The database records
shall be in the same approved format as the database records pursuant to
subsection (6) of this section and shall meet the requirements developed
pursuant to the federal Mobile Telecommunications Sourcing Act, 4 U.S.C.
119(a), as such act existed on January 1, 2003. The governing board may
allow a member state to require sellers that register under the agreement
to use an address-based boundary database provided by that member state.
If any member state develops an address-based boundary database pursuant
to the agreement, a seller or certified service provider may use those
database records in place of the five-digit and nine-digit zip code
database records provided for in subsection (6) of this section. If a
seller or certified service provider is unable to determine the
applicable rate and jurisdiction using an address-based boundary database
after exercising due diligence, the seller or certified service provider
may utilize the database described in subsection (8) of this section to
apply the nine-digit zip code designation applicable to a purchase. If a
nine-digit zip code designation is not available for a street address or
if a seller or certified service provider is unable to determine the
nine-digit zip code designation applicable to a purchase after exercising
due diligence to determine the designation, the seller or certified
service provider may utilize the database described in subsection (8) of
this section to apply the rate for the five-digit zip code area. For the
purposes of this subsection section, there is a rebuttable presumption
that a seller or certified service provider has exercised due diligence
if the seller or certified service provider has attempted to determine
the tax rate and jurisdiction by utilizing the databases described in
-4-

LB269 LB269
2025 2025
this subsection and subsection (8) of this section software approved by
the governing board that makes this assignment from the address and zip
code information applicable to the purchase. The Tax Commissioner shall
adopt and promulgate rules and regulations requiring verification by the
Department of Revenue of addresses contained within the state's address-
based boundary database, and requiring verification by the Department of
Revenue of appropriate sales and use tax rates utilized on a sales and
use tax or use tax return when online or remote transactions are
included.
(7) (8) The state may certify vendor-provided address-based boundary
databases for assigning tax rates and jurisdictions. The databases shall
be in the same approved format as the database described in records
pursuant to subsection (6) (7) of this section and shall meet the
requirements developed pursuant to the federal Mobile Telecommunications
Sourcing Act, 4 U.S.C. 119(a) as such act existed on January 1, 2003. If
a state certifies a vendor-provided address-based boundary database, a
seller or certified service provider may use that database in place of
the database provided for in subsection (6) or (7) of this section.
Vendors providing address-based boundary databases may request
certification of their databases from the governing board. Certification
by the governing board does not replace the requirement that the
databases be certified by the states individually.
(8) The state shall provide and maintain a database that assigns
each five-digit and nine-digit zip code within the state to the proper
tax rates and jurisdictions in addition to the address-based boundary
database required by subsection (6) of this section. Such zip code
boundary database shall only be used as described in subsection (6) of
this section. For purposes of the streamlined sales and use tax
agreement, the zip code boundary database shall apply the lowest combined
tax rate imposed in the zip code area if the area includes more than one
tax rate in any level of taxing jurisdictions.
-5-

LB269 LB269
2025 2025
(9) Pursuant to the streamlined sales and use tax agreement, the
state shall relieve retailers and certified service providers using
databases pursuant to subsection (6) or (7) of this section from
liability to the state and local jurisdictions for having charged and
collected the incorrect amount of sales or use tax resulting from the
retailer or certified service provider relying on erroneous data provided
by a member state on tax rates, boundaries, or taxing jurisdiction
assignments. After providing adequate notice determined by the governing
board, a member state that provides an address-based boundary database
for assigning taxing jurisdictions pursuant to subsection (7) or (8) of
this section may cease providing liability relief for errors resulting
from the reliance on the database provided by the member state under the
provisions of subsection (6) of this section. If a seller demonstrates
that requiring the use of the address-based boundary database would
create an undue hardship, the state and the governing board may extend
the relief of liability to such seller for a designated period of time.
(10) The databases provided for in this section shall be in a
downloadable format approved by the governing board pursuant to the
streamlined sales and use tax agreement. The databases may be directly
provided by the state or provided by a vendor as designated by the state.
A database provided by a vendor as designated by a state shall be
applicable to and subject to all provisions of this section. The
databases shall be provided at no cost to the user of the database. The
provisions of subsection subsections (6) and (7) of this section do not
apply when the purchased product is received by the purchaser at the
business location of the seller.
(11) A seller that did not have a requirement to register in this
state prior to registering pursuant to the agreement or a certified
service provider shall not be required to collect sales or use taxes for
a state until the first day of the calendar quarter commencing more than
sixty days after the state has provided the databases required by this
-6-

LB269 LB269
2025 2025
section.
Sec. 2. This act becomes operative on January 1, 2026.
Sec. 3. Original section 77-27,143, Reissue Revised Statutes of
Nebraska, is repealed.
-7-